Virginia statutes. Title 3.2. Agriculture, Animal Care, and Food.
Article 9. Cruelty to Animals.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

1B M.J. Animals, § 14; 12A M.J. Livery Stables, § 1.

§ 3.2-6570.
Cruelty to animals; penalty.

Any person who (i) overrides, overdrives, overloads, ill-treats, or abandons any animal, whether belonging to himself or another; (ii) tortures any animal, willfully inflicts inhumane injury or pain not connected with bona fide scientific or medical experimentation on any animal, or cruelly or unnecessarily beats, maims, mutilates, or kills any animal, whether belonging to himself or another; (iii) deprives any animal of necessary food, drink, shelter, or emergency veterinary treatment; (iv) sores any equine for any purpose or administers drugs or medications to alter or mask such soring for the purpose of sale, show, or exhibition of any kind, unless such administration of drugs or medications is within the context of a veterinary client-patient relationship and solely for therapeutic purposes; (v) ropes, lassoes, or otherwise obstructs or interferes with one or more legs of an equine in order to intentionally cause it to trip or fall for the purpose of engagement in a rodeo, contest, exhibition, entertainment, or sport unless such actions are in the practice of accepted animal husbandry or for the purpose of allowing veterinary care; (vi) willfully sets on foot, instigates, engages in, or in any way furthers any act of cruelty to any animal; (vii) carries or causes to be carried by any vehicle, vessel or otherwise any animal in a cruel, brutal, or inhumane manner, so as to produce torture or unnecessary suffering; or (viii) causes any of the above things, or being the owner of such animal permits such acts to be done by another is guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor.In addition to the penalties provided in this subsection, the court may, in its discretion, require any person convicted of a violation of this subsection to attend an anger management or other appropriate treatment program or obtain psychiatric or psychological counseling. The court may impose the costs of such a program or counseling upon the person convicted.

Any person who (i) tortures, willfully inflicts inhumane injury or pain not connected with bona fide scientific or medical experimentation, or cruelly and unnecessarily beats, maims, mutilates or kills any animal whether belonging to himself or another; (ii) sores any equine for any purpose or administers drugs or medications to alter or mask such soring for the purpose of sale, show, or exhibit of any kind, unless such administration of drugs or medications is under the supervision of a licensed veterinarian and solely for therapeutic purposes; (iii) ropes, lassoes, or otherwise obstructs or interferes with one or more legs of an equine in order to intentionally cause it to trip or fall for the purpose of engagement in a rodeo, contest, exhibition, entertainment, or sport unless such actions are in the practice of accepted animal husbandry or for the purpose of allowing veterinary care; (iv) maliciously deprives any companion animal of necessary food, drink, shelter or emergency veterinary treatment; (v) instigates, engages in, or in any way furthers any act of cruelty to any animal set forth in clauses (i) through (iv); or (vi) causes any of the actions described in clauses (i) through (v), or being the owner of such animal permits such acts to be done by another; and has been within five years convicted of a violation of this subsection or subsection A, is guilty of a Class 6 felony if the current violation or any previous violation of this subsection or subsection A resulted in the death of an animal or the euthanasia of an animal based on the recommendation of a licensed veterinarian upon determination that such euthanasia was necessary due to the condition of the animal, and such condition was a direct result of a violation of this subsection or subsection A.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit the dehorning of cattle conducted in a reasonable and customary manner.

This section shall not prohibit authorized wildlife management activities or hunting, fishing or trapping as regulated under other titles of the Code of Virginia, including Title 29.1, or to farming activities as provided under this title or regulations adopted hereunder.

It is unlawful for any person to kill a domestic dog or cat for the purpose of obtaining the hide, fur or pelt of the dog or cat. A violation of this subsection is a Class 1 misdemeanor. A second or subsequent violation of this subsection is a Class 6 felony.

Any person who (i) tortures, willfully inflicts inhumane injury or pain not connected with bona fide scientific or medical experimentation, or cruelly and unnecessarily beats, maims, or mutilates any dog or cat that is a companion animal whether belonging to him or another and (ii) as a direct result causes serious bodily injury to such dog or cat that is a companion animal, the death of such dog or cat that is a companion animal, or the euthanasia of such animal on the recommendation of a licensed veterinarian upon determination that such euthanasia was necessary due to the condition of the animal is guilty of a Class 6 felony. If a dog or cat is attacked on its owner’s property by a dog so as to cause injury or death, the owner of the injured dog or cat may use all reasonable and necessary force against the dog at the time of the attack to protect his dog or cat. Such owner may be presumed to have taken necessary and appropriate action to defend his dog or cat and shall therefore be presumed not to have violated this subsection. The provisions of this subsection shall not overrule §

3.2-6540

,

3.2-6540.1

, or

3.2-6552

.For the purposes of this subsection, “serious bodily injury” means bodily injury that involves substantial risk of death, extreme physical pain, protracted and obvious disfigurement, or protracted loss or impairment of the function of a bodily member, organ, or mental faculty.

Any person convicted of violating this section may be prohibited by the court from possession or ownership of companion animals.

History.

1984, c. 492, § 29-213.91; 1987, c. 488, § 3.1-796.122; 1992, c. 177; 1998, c. 817; 1999, cc. 209, 620, 645; 2002, cc. 351, 500, 583, 613; 2003, cc. 787, 788; 2004, c. 217; 2007, c. 743; 2008, c. 860; 2013, cc. 58, 732; 2015, c. 491; 2019, cc. 536, 537.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 6 felonies, see §

18.2-10

.

As to punishment for Class 1 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

As to punishment for offenses involving cruelty to animals under subsection A, see §

18.2-403.1

.

As to punishment for soring horses, see §

18.2-403.2

.

As to limitations of prosecution of violations of subsection A or B of this section, see §

19.2-8

.

As to required reports to the Central Criminal Records Exchange, see §

19.2-390

.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2008, cc. 543 and 707 amended former § 3.1-796.122, from which this section is derived. The section was rewritten by Acts 2008, c. 860, making the changes by cc. 543 and 707 no longer applicable.

Acts 2015, c. 491, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act may result in a net increase in periods of imprisonment or commitment. Pursuant to § 30-19.1:4, the estimated amount of the necessary appropriation cannot be determined for periods of imprisonment in state adult correctional facilities; therefore, Chapter 2 of the Acts of Assembly of 2014, Special Session I, requires the Virginia Criminal Sentencing Commission to assign a minimum fiscal impact of $50,000. Pursuant to § 30-19.1:4, the estimated amount of the necessary appropriation cannot be determined for periods of commitment to the custody of the Department of Juvenile Justice.”

Acts 2019, cc. 536 and 537, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act may result in a net increase in periods of imprisonment or commitment. Pursuant to § 30-19.1:4 of the Code of Virginia, the estimated amount of the necessary appropriation cannot be determined for periods of imprisonment in state adult correctional facilities; therefore, Chapter 2 of the Acts of Assembly of 2018, Special Session I, requires the Virginia Criminal Sentencing Commission to assign a minimum fiscal impact of $50,000. Pursuant to § 30-19.1:4 of the Code of Virginia, the estimated amount of the necessary appropriation cannot be determined for periods of commitment to the custody of the Department of Juvenile Justice.”

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendments by cc. 58 and 732 are identical, and inserted “3.2-6540.1,” near the end of subsection F.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 491 in subsection A, added clause (iv) and redesignated former clauses (iv) through (vi) as clauses (v) through (vii); in subsection B, added clause (iii), redesignated former clauses (iii) and (iv) as clauses (iv) and (v), substituted “clauses (i) through (iv); or” for “clauses (i) through (iv) or (vi)” and “clauses (i) through (v)” for “clauses (i) through (iv).”

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendments by cc. 536 and 537 are identical, and in subsection A, substituted “ill-treats, or abandons any animal, whether belonging to himself or another; (ii) tortures any animal” for “tortures, ill-treats, abandons,” inserted “on any animal” following “experimentation” and redesignated the remaining clauses accordingly; in subsection F, inserted “serious bodily injury to such dog or cat that is a companion animal” in clause (ii) and added the second paragraph; and made stylistic changes.

Law Review.

For annual survey article, “Criminal Law and Procedure,” see 46 U. Rich. L. Rev. 59 (2011).

For article, “From Animal Control to Zoning: 2019 Local Government Law Update,” see 54 U. Rich. L. Rev. 205 (2019).

§ 3.2-6570.1.
Sale of animals after cruelty or neglect conviction; penalty.

Any person who has been convicted of a violation of any law concerning abuse, neglect, or cruelty to animals that sells, offers for sale, or trades any companion animal is guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor. However, a person may dispose of animals under the provisions of a court order.

History.

2008, c. 852, § 3.1-796.122:1.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 1 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2008, c. 852, enacted § 3.1-796.122:1, effective January 1, 2009. Pursuant to § 30-152, the section was given effect as set out above.

§ 3.2-6571.
Animal fighting; penalty.

No person shall knowingly:

Promote, prepare for, engage in, or be employed in, the fighting of animals for amusement, sport, or gain;

Attend an exhibition of the fighting of animals;

Authorize or allow any person to undertake any act described in this section on any premises under his charge or control; or

Aid or abet any such acts.Except as provided in subsection B, any person who violates any provision of this subsection is guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor.

Any person who violates any provision of subsection A in combination with one or more of the following is guilty of a Class 6 felony:

When a dog is one of the animals;

When any device or substance intended to enhance an animal’s ability to fight or to inflict injury upon another animal is used, or possessed with intent to use it for such purpose;

When money or anything of value is wagered on the result of such fighting;

When money or anything of value is paid or received for the admission of a person to a place for animal fighting;

When any animal is possessed, owned, trained, transported, or sold with the intent that the animal engage in an exhibition of fighting with another animal; or

When he permits or causes a minor to (i) attend an exhibition of the fighting of any animals or (ii) undertake or be involved in any act described in this subsection.

Any animal control officer, as defined in §

3.2-6500

, shall confiscate any tethered cock or any other animal that he determines has been, is, or is intended to be used in animal fighting and any equipment used in training such animal or used in animal fighting.
C. 1. Any animal control officer, as defined in §

3.2-6500

, shall confiscate any tethered cock or any other animal that he determines has been, is, or is intended to be used in animal fighting and any equipment used in training such animal or used in animal fighting.

Upon confiscation of an animal, the animal control officer shall petition the appropriate court for a hearing for a determination of whether the animal has been, is, or is intended to be used in animal fighting. The hearing shall be not more than 10 business days from the date of the confiscation of the animal. If the court finds that the animal has not been used, is not used, and is not intended to be used in animal fighting, it shall order the animal released to its owner. However, if the court finds probable cause to believe that the animal has been, is, or is intended to be used in animal fighting, the court shall order the animal forfeited to the locality unless the owner posts bond in surety with the locality in an amount sufficient to compensate the locality for its cost of caring for the animal for a period of nine months. He shall post additional bond for each successive nine-month period until a final determination by the trial court on any criminal charges brought pursuant to subsection A or B.

Upon a final determination of guilt by the trial court on criminal charges brought pursuant to subsection A or B, the court shall order that the animal be forfeited to the locality. Upon a final determination of not guilty by the trial court on the underlying criminal charges, a confiscated animal shall be returned to its owner and any bond shall be refunded to him.

Any person convicted of violating any provision of subsection A or B shall be prohibited by the court from possession or ownership of companion animals or fowl.

In addition to fines and costs, the court shall order any person who is convicted of a violation of this section to pay all reasonable costs incurred in housing, caring for, or euthanizing any confiscated animal. If the court finds that the actual costs are reasonable, it may order payment of actual costs.

The provisions of this section shall not apply to any law-enforcement officer in the performance of his duties. This section shall not prohibit (i) authorized wildlife management activities or hunting, fishing, or trapping authorized under any title of the Code of Virginia or regulations promulgated thereto or (ii) farming activities authorized under Title 3.2 of the Code of Virginia or regulations promulgated thereto.

History.

1985, c. 408, § 29-213.92:1; 1987, c. 488, § 3.1-796.124; 1998, c. 817; 1999, c. 113; 2003, c. 857; 2008, cc. 543, 707, 860; 2019, c. 345.

Cross references.

As to punishment for felonies and misdemeanors, see §§

18.2-10

,

18.2-11

.

As to definition of “Racketeering activity,” see §

18.2-513

.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2008, cc. 543 and 707, rewrote former § 3.1-796.124, from which this section is derived. Pursuant to § 30-152, the 2008 amendments by cc. 543 and 707 have been given effect in this section as set out above.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 345, in subdivision C 1, inserted “tethered cock or any other”; in subsection D, substituted “fowl” for “cocks” at the end; and made stylistic changes.

Law Review.

For annual survey article, “Animal Law,” see 44 U. Rich. L. Rev. 185 (2009).

§ 3.2-6572.
Reserved.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2008, cc. 543 and 707 repealed former § 3.1-796.125, from which this section was derived. Pursuant to § 30-152, this section has been set out as reserved at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission.

§ 3.2-6573.
Shooting birds for amusement, and renting premises for such purposes; penalty.

Live pigeons or other birds or fowl shall not be kept or used for the purpose of a target, or to be shot at either for amusement or as a test of skill in marksmanship. It is a Class 4 misdemeanor to shoot at a bird kept or used as aforesaid, or to be a party to such shooting. Any person who lets any building, room, field or premises, or knowingly permits the use thereof for the purpose of such shooting is guilty of a Class 4 misdemeanor.

Nothing contained herein shall apply to the shooting of wild game.

History.

1984, c. 492, § 29-213.94; 1987, c. 488, § 3.1-796.126; 2008, c. 860.

Cross references.

As to punishment for violations of this section, see §

18.2-403.3

.